Nebraska, session 109, LB1185.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1185 LB1185
2026 2026
Section 1. Sections 1 to 7 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Conversational Artificial Intelligence Safety Act.
Sec. 2. For purposes of the Conversational Artificial Intelligence
Safety Act:
(1) Account holder means an individual who has, or opens, an account
or profile to use a conversational artificial intelligence service;
(2)(a) Conversational artificial intelligence service means an
artificial intelligence software application, web interface, or computer
program that is accessible to the general public and that primarily
simulates human conversation and interaction through textual, visual, or
aural communications.
(b) Conversational artificial intelligence service does not include
an application, web interface, or computer program that is any of the
following:
(i) Primarily designed and marketed for use by developers or
researchers;
(ii) A feature within another software application, web interface,
or computer program that is not a conversational artificial intelligence
service;
(iii) Designed to provide outputs relating to a narrow and discrete
topic;
(iv) Primarily designed and marketed for commercial use by business
entities;
(v) Functions as a speaker and voice command interface or voice-
activated virtual assistant for a consumer electronic device; or
(vi) Used by a business solely for internal purposes;
(3) Individual means a natural person;
(4) Minor means an individual that, based upon the circumstance, the
operator has actual knowledge or reasonable certainty is younger than
eighteen years of age;
(5) Minor account holder means an account holder who is a minor;
-2-

LB1185 LB1185
2026 2026
(6)(a) Operator means a person who develops and makes available a
conversational artificial intelligence service to the public.
(b) Operator does not include mobile application stores or search
engines solely because they provide access to a conversational artificial
intelligence service;
(7) Person means a natural person or legal entity; and
(8) Sexually explicit conduct and visual depiction have the same
meanings as in 18 U.S.C. 2256.
Sec. 3. (1) An operator shall clearly and conspicuously disclose to
each minor account holder that such minor account holder is interacting
with artificial intelligence:
(a) As a persistent visible disclaimer; or
(b) Both:
(i) At the beginning of each session; and
(ii) Appearing at least every three hours in a continuous
conversational artificial intelligence service interaction.
(2) An operator shall not provide a minor account holder with points
or similar rewards at unpredictable intervals with the intent to
encourage increased engagement with the conversational artificial
intelligence service.
(3) An operator shall, for minor account holders, institute
reasonable measures to prevent the conversational artificial intelligence
service from:
(a) Producing visual depictions of sexually explicit conduct;
(b) Generating direct statements that the account holder should
engage in sexually explicit conduct; or
(c) Generating statements that sexually objectify the account
holder.
(4) For minor account holders, the operator shall institute
reasonable measures to prevent the conversational artificial intelligence
service from generating statements that would lead a reasonable person to
-3-

LB1185 LB1185
2026 2026
believe that they are interacting with a human, including:
(a) Explicit claims that the conversational artificial intelligence
service is sentient or human;
(b) Statements that simulate emotional dependence;
(c) Statements that simulate romantic or sexual innuendos; or
(d) Role-playing of adult-minor romantic relationships.
(5) An operator shall offer tools for minor account holders, and,
when such account holders are younger than thirteen years of age, their
parents or guardians, to manage the account holders' privacy and account
settings. An operator shall also offer related tools to the parents or
guardians of minor account holders thirteen years of age and older, as
appropriate based on relevant risks.
Sec. 4. If a reasonable person interacting with a conversational
artificial intelligence system would be misled to believe that the person
is interacting with a human, an operator shall clearly and conspicuously
disclose that the conversational artificial intelligence service is
artificial intelligence.
Sec. 5. An operator shall adopt a protocol for the conversational
artificial intelligence service to respond to user prompts regarding
suicidal ideation or self-harm that includes, but is not limited to,
making reasonable efforts to provide a response to the user that refers
them to crisis service providers such as a suicide hotline, crisis text
line, or other appropriate crisis services.
Sec. 6. An operator shall not knowingly and intentionally cause or
program a conversational artificial intelligence service to make any
representation or statement that explicitly indicates that the
conversational artificial intelligence service is designed to provide
professional mental or behavioral health care.
Sec. 7. (1) The Attorney General shall enforce the Conversational
Artificial Intelligence Safety Act.
(2)(a) The Attorney General may bring a civil action for appropriate
-4-

LB1185 LB1185
2026 2026
relief against an operator for a violation of the Conversational
Artificial Intelligence Safety Act, on behalf of the State of Nebraska or
on behalf of any person aggrieved by a violation of the act.
(b) In an action under this section, appropriate relief includes:
(i) Such preliminary and other equitable or declaratory relief as
may be appropriate;
(ii) An award of actual damages;
(iii) Civil penalties of at least one thousand dollars per
violation, but in no event more than five hundred thousand dollars per
operator; and
(iv) Reasonable expenses incurred in bringing the civil action,
including court costs, reasonable attorney's fees, investigative costs,
witness fees, and deposition costs.
(3) Nothing in the Conversational Artificial Intelligence Safety Act
can be interpreted as creating a private right of action.
(4) The Conversational Artificial Intelligence Act shall not create
liability for the developer of an artificial intelligence model for any
violation of the act by an artificial intelligence system developed by a
third party to provide a conversational artificial intelligence service
for such developer.
Sec. 8. This act becomes operative on July 1, 2027.
-5-